bg-BG: Компоненти на играта: Чаши; Тесте карти; Зарове; Игрална дъска; Дженга блокове; Топчета за пинг-понг; Други
pt-BR: Componentes do jogo: Copos; Baralho de cartas; Dados; Tabuleiro de jogo; Blocos de Jenga; Bolas de pingue-pongue; Outro
hu: Játék összetevői: Poharak; Kártyapakli; Dobókocka; Játéktábla; Jengakockák; Asztalitenisz-labdák; Egyéb
ro-RO: Componente joc: Pahare; Pachet de cărți; Zaruri; Tablă de joc; Blocuri Jenga; Mingi de ping pong; Altele
pl: Komponenty gry: Kubki; Talia kart; Kości; Gra planszowa; Klocki Jenga; Piłeczki do ping-ponga; Pozostałe
es: Componentes del juego: Tazas; Baraja de cartas; Dado; Juego de mesa; Bloques de jenga; Pelotas de ping pong; Otros
nl: Spelcomponenten: Bekers; Pak kaarten; Dobbelsteen; Spelbord; Jenga-blokken; Pingpongballen; Andere
hr-HR: Dijelovi igre: Čaše; Špil karata; Kocke; Igraća ploča; Jenga blokovi; Loptice za stolni tenis; Ostalo
vi: Thành phần của trò chơi: Cúp; Bộ bài; Xúc xắc; Bàn cờ; Bộ rút gỗ; Bóng chơi bóng bàn; Khác
fi: Pelikomponentit: Kupit; Korttipakka; Nopat; Pelilauta; Jenga-lohkot; Pingispallot; Muu
en: Game components: Cups; Deck of cards; Dice; Game board; Jenga blocks; Ping pong balls; Other
lt-LT: Žaidimo komponentai: Puodeliai; Kortų kaladė; Kauliukas; Žaidimų lenta; „Jenga“ kaladėlės; Stalo teniso kamuoliukai; Kita
ko: 게임 구성품: 컵; 카드덱; 주사위; 게임 보드; 젠가 블록; 탁구공; 기타
da: Spilkomponenter: Kopper; Spillekort; Terning; Spilleplade; Jenga-klodser; Bordtennisbolde; Andet
sl-SI: Sestavni deli igre: Skodelice; Paket kart; Kocke; Igralna plošča; Jenga bloki; Žogice za namizni tenis; Drugo
ru: Состав игрового набора: Чашки; Колода карт; Кости; Игровое поле; Блоки дженги; Мячики для пинг-понга; Другой
nb: Spillkomponenter: Kopper; Kortstokk; Terning; Spillbrett; Jengablokker; Bordtennisballer; Annen
it: Componenti del gioco: Tazze; Mazzo di carte; Dado; Tavolo da gioco; Blocchi Jenga; Palline da ping pong; Altro
pt-PT: Componentes do jogo: Copos; Baralho de cartas; Dados; Tabuleiro de jogo; Blocos de jenga; Bolas de pingue-pongue; Outro
ja: ゲームコンポーネント: カップ; トランプ; サイコロ; ゲームボード; ジェンガブロック; ピンポン玉; その他
de: Spielkomponenten: Tassen; Kartendeck; Würfel; Spielbrett; Jenga; Tischtennisbälle; Sonstiges
cs: Herní součásti: Šálky; Balíček karet; Kostka; Hrací deska; Jenga bloky; Míčky na stolní tenis; Jiné
sv: Spelkomponenter: Koppar; Kortlek; Tärningar; Spelbräda; Jenga-block; Pingisbollar; Annat
zh-TW: 遊戲零組件: 杯子; 一副牌; 骰子; 遊戲板; 疊疊樂塊; 乒乓球用球; 其他
fr: Composants du jeu: Verres en plastique; Paquet de cartes; Dé; Plateau de jeu; Blocs Jenga; Balles de ping pong; Autre
tr: Oyun Bileşenleri: Kupalar; Kart destesi; Zar; Oyun tahtası; Jenga blokları; Masa tenisi topları; Diğer
el: Στοιχεία παιχνιδιού: Κούπες; Τράπουλα; Ζάρια; Ταμπλό παιχνιδιού; Τουβλάκια Jenga; Μπαλάκια του πινγκ πονγκ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Súčasti hry: Poháre; Balíček kariet; Kocky; Herná doska; Bloky Jenga; Pingpongové loptičky; Iné
th: ส่วนประกอบเกม: ถ้วย; สำรับไพ่; ลูกเต๋า; เกมกระดาน; เกมไม้เจงก้า; ลูกปิงปอง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 游戏组件: 杯子; 一副牌; 骰子; 游戏板; 叠叠乐块; 乒乓球; 其他